Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 15.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-4838
Coordination of procurement and use.

Each
hospital in this state shall enter into agreements or affiliations with procurement
organizations for coordination of procurement and use of anatomical gifts.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 15.